Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982. Other minor word changes were made in this title in 1981, 1983, 1987, 1992, 2004, 2012, and 2020.

Cross references. —

For fisheries business license, taxes and assessments, see AS 43.76.

Administrative Code. —

For fish and game, see 5 AAC.